vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Phụ tùng xe cơ giới > Linh kiện truyền động và dẫn động cho xe có động cơ: Trục; Bốt CV; Khớp CV; Đĩa ly hợp; Đường ống ly hợp; Xi lanh chính ly hợp; Mâm ép ly hợp; Vòng nhả côn; Xi lanh phụ ly hợp; Bộ ly hợp; Bộ vi sai; Trục truyền động; Bánh đà; Trục chân vịt; Bộ làm mát truyền động; Bộ lọc truyền động; Chất lỏng truyền động; Giá đỡ truyền động; Hệ thống truyền động
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Motorinių transporto priemonių dalys > Variklinių transporto priemonių transmisijos ir pavarų dalys: Ašys; CV apsauga; CV jungtys; Sankabos diskai; Sankabos žarnelės; Pagrindiniai sankabos cilindrai; Sankabos slėgio plokštės; Sankabos atleidimo guoliai; Sankabos pagalbiniai cilindrai; Sankabos; Diferencialai; Varomieji velenai; Smagračiai; Šarnyriniai velenai; Pavarų dėžės aušintuvai; Pavarų dėžės filtrai; Pavarų dėžės skystis; Pavarų dėžės laikikliai; Pavarų dėžės
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Moottoriajoneuvojen osat > Moottoriajoneuvojen vaihteiston ja ajolaitteiden osat: Akselit; Vakionopeusnivelen kumit; Vakionopeusnivelet; Kytkinlevyt; Kytkimen letkut; Kytkimen pääsylinterit; Kytkimen painelevyt; Kytkimen vapautuslaakerit; Kytkimen työsylinterit; Kytkimet; Differentiaalit; Vetoakselit; Vauhtipyörät; Kardaaniakselit; Vaihteiston jäähdyttimet; Vaihteiston suodattimet; Vaihteistonesteet; Vaihteiston kiinnikkeet; Vaihteistot
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonsdelar > Delar till växellådor och drivlinor: Axlar; Drivknutar; CV-leder; Kopplingsskivor; Kopplingslinor; Huvudkopplingscylindrar; Tryckplattor för koppling; Utlösningslager för koppling; Koppling slavcylindrar; Kopplingar; Differentialer; Drivaxlar; Svänghjul; Kardanaxlar; Växellådskylare; Transmissionsfilter; Transmissionsolja; Transmissionsfästen; Transmissioner
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 자동차 부품 > 자동차 변속기/동력전달장치 부품: 차축; CV 부츠; CV 조인트; 클러치 디스크; 클러치 라인; 클러치 마스터 실린더; 클러치 프레셔 플레이트; 클러치 릴리스 베어링; 클러치 슬레이브 실린더; 클러치; 차동 장치; 드라이브 샤프트; 플라이휠; 프로펠러 샤프트; 변속기 냉각기; 변속기 필터; 변속기 오일; 변속기 마운트; 변속기
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Peças para veículos motorizados > Peças de transmissão para veículos motorizados: Eixos; Botas de junta homocinética; Juntas homocinéticas; Discos de embraiagem; Tubo da embraiagem; Cilindros principais da embraiagem; Pratos de pressão da embraiagem; Rolamentos de encosto da embraiagem; Cilindros auxiliares da embraiagem; Embraiagens; Diferenciais; Eixos de transmissão; Volantes do motor; Veios de transmissão; Sistemas de arrefecimento de transmissão; Filtros de transmissão; Fluido de transmissão; Suportes de transmissão; Transmissões
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøydeler > Girkasse- og drivlinjedeler til kjøretøy: Aksler; CV-mansjetter; CV-ledd; Clutchskiver; Clutchkabler; Hovedsylindre for clutch; Clutchtrykkplater; Utløserlager for clutch; Følgesylindre for clutch; Clutcher; Differensialer; Drivaksler; Svinghjul; Drivaksling; Girkassekjølere; Girfiltre; Girvæske; Girfester; Girkasser
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων > Εξαρτήματα μετάδοσης & κίνησης μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων: Άξονες (Axles); Φούσκες σταθερής ταχύτητας; Σύνδεσμοι σταθερής ταχύτητας; Δίσκοι συμπλέκτη; Γραμμές συμπλέκτη; Κύλινδροι κύριου συμπλέκτη; Πλάκες πίεσης συμπλέκτη; Ρουλεμάν απελευθέρωσης συμπλέκτη; Κύλινδροι βοηθητικού συμπλέκτη; Συμπλέκτες; Διαφορικά; Άξονες μετάδοσης; Σφόνδυλοι; Διαμήκεις άξονες; Ψύκτες μετάδοσης; Φίλτρα μετάδοσης; Υγρό μετάδοσης; Βάσεις μετάδοσης; Μεταδόσεις
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Motorvoertuigonderdelen > Versnellingsbak- en aandrijflijnonderdelen voor motorvoertuigen: Assen; Afdichtingshoezen voor homokineten; Homokineten; Koppelingsplaten; Koppelingsleidingen; Koppelinghoofdcylinders; Koppelingsdrukplaten; Koppeling druklagers; Koppelings-slaafcilinders; Koppelingen voor motorvoertuigen; Differentiëlen; Aandrijfassen; Vliegwielen; Cardanassen; Versnellingsbakkoelers; Versnellingsbakfilters; Versnellingsbakvloeistof; Versnellingsbaksteunen; Versnellingsbakken
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Motor Vehicle Parts > Motor Vehicle Transmission & Drivetrain Parts: Axles; CV Boots; CV Joints; Clutch Discs; Clutch Lines; Clutch Master Cylinders; Clutch Pressure Plates; Clutch Release Bearings; Clutch Slave Cylinders; Clutches; Differentials; Drive Shafts; Flywheels; Propshafts; Transmission Coolers; Transmission Filters; Transmission Fluid; Transmission Mounts; Transmissions
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนรถยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนชุดส่งและถ่ายทอดกำลังรถยนต์: เพลา; บูท CV; ข้อต่อซีวี; แผ่นคลัตช์; สายคลัตช์; กระบอกสูบหลักคลัตช์; แผ่นกดคลัตช์; ลูกปืนคลัตช์; กระบอกสูบคลัตช์รอง; คลัตช์; เฟืองท้าย; เพลาขับ; มู่เล่; เพลาขับ; คูลเลอร์เกียร์; ตัวกรองเกียร์; น้ำมันเกียร์; ตัวยึดเกียร์; เกียร์
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Kfz-Teile > Getriebe- & Antriebsteile: Achsen; Achsmanschetten; Gleichlaufgelenke; Kupplungsscheiben; Kupplungsleitungen; Kupplungsgeberzylinder; Kupplungsdruckplatten; Ausrücklager; Kupplungsnehmerzylinder; Kupplungen; Differetialgetriebe; Antriebswellen; Schwungräder; Gelenkwellen; Getriebekühler; Getriebefilter; Getriebeöl; Getriebelager; Getriebe
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele til motorkøretøjer > Transmissionsdele til motorkøretøjer: Aksler; CV-boots; CV-led; Koblingsskiver; Koblingslinjer; Master-koblingscylindere; Koblingstrykplader; Koblingsudløserlejer; Slave-koblingscylindere; Koblinger; Differentialer; Drivaksler; Svinghjul; Kardanaksler; Transmissionskølere; Transmissionsfiltre; Transmissionsvæske; Transmissionsbeslag; Transmissioner
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części do pojazdów silnikowych > Części układu przeniesienia napędu: Osie; Osłony przegubów homokinetycznych; Przeguby homokinetyczne; Tarcze sprzęgła; Przewody sprzęgła; Pompy sprzęgła; Tarcze dociskowe sprzęgła; Łożyska sprzęgła; Wysprzęgliki; Sprzęgła; Mechanizmy różnicowe; Wały napędowe; Koła zamachowe; Wały transmisyjne; Chłodnice skrzyni biegów; Filtry przekładniowe; Płyn przekładniowy; Mocowania skrzyni biegów; Skrzynie biegów
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli za motorna vozila > Deli za menjalnike in pogonske sklope motornih vozil: Osi; Manšete homokinetičnih zglobov; Homokinetični zglobi; Diski sklopk; Cevi sklopk; Glavni valji sklopk; Tlačne plošče sklopk; Ležaji za sprostitev sklopke; Pomožni valji sklopk; Sklopke; Diferenciali; Pogonske gredi; Vztrajniki; Pogonske gredi; Hladilniki olja za menjalnik; Filtri za menjalnike; Tekočina za menjalnike; Nosilci menjalnika; Menjalniki
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi za motorna vozila > Dijelovi prijenosa i pogona za motorna vozila: Osovine; Manžeta homokinetičkog zgloba; Homokinetički zglobovi; Lamele; Crijevo spojke; Glavni cilindri spojke; Potisne ploče spojke; Potisni ležajevi; Pomoćni cilindri spojke; Spojke; Diferencijali; Pogonske osovine; Zamašnjaci; Kardan; Hladnjaci za prijenosni sustav; Filtar automatskog mjenjača; Tekućina za prijenosni sustav; Nosači za prijenosni sustav; Prijenosni sustavi
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Автомобильные запчасти > Детали автомобильной трансмиссии: Мосты; Пыльники ШРУСов; ШРУСы; Диски сцепления; Накладки дисков сцепления; Главные цилиндры сцепления; Нажимные диски сцепления; Выжимные подшипники сцепления; Вспомогательные цилиндры сцепления; Сцепления; Дифференциалы; Приводные валы; Маховики; Карданные валы; Радиаторы охлаждения для коробки передач; Фильтры коробки передач; Трансмиссионная жидкость; Крепления коробки передач; Коробки передач
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 自動車・バイク用パーツ > 自動車・バイク用トランスミッションパーツ: 車軸; CVブーツ; CVジョイント; クラッチディスク; クラッチライン; クラッチマスターシリンダー; クラッチ圧プレート; クラッチリリースベアリング; クラッチスレーブシリンダー; クラッチ; ディファレンシャル; ドライブシャフト; フライホイール; プロペラシャフト; トランスミッションクーラー; トランスミッションフィルター; トランスミッションフルード; トランスミッションマウント; トランスミッション
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 机动车零部件 > 汽车传动系统部件: 车轴; 等速万向节防尘罩; 等速万向节; 离合器片; 离合器管路; 离合器主缸; 离合器压盘; 离合器分离轴承; 离合器从动缸; 离合器; 差速器; 驱动轴; 飞轮; 传动轴; 变速箱冷却器; 变速箱滤清器; 传动液; 变速箱装置; 变速箱
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese autovehicule > Transmisie și piese tren de rulare autovehicule: Osii; Protecții CV; Articulații CV; Discuri de ambreiaj; Linii de ambreiaj; Cilindri principali de ambreiaj; Plăci de presiune ambreiaj; Rulmenți de eliberare ambreiaj; Cilindri secundari de ambreiaj; Ambreiaje; Diferențiale; Arbori de transmisie; Volanți; Arbori de transmisie; Răcitoare transmisie; Filtre transmisie; Lichid de transmisie; Suporturi transmisie; Transmisii
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças para veículos motorizados > Peças do sistema de direção e transmissão para veículos motorizados: Eixos; Capas de juntas VC; Juntas VC; Discos de embreagem; Linhas de embreagem; Cilindros mestre de embreagem; Placas de pressão da embreagem; Rolamento de desengate de embreagem; Cilindros escravo de embreagem; Embreagens; Diferenciais; Eixos de transmissão; Volantes de inércia; Eixos cardan; Resfriadores de transmissão; Filtros de transmissão; Fluído de transmissão; Suportes de transmissão; Transmissões
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части за моторни превозни средства > Части за трансмисия и задвижване на моторни превозни средства: Оси; Маншони; Карета; Дискове на съединителя; Тръбички регулатор налягане; Горни помпи за съединител; Притискателни дискове на съединителя; Лагери за освобождаване на съединителя; Долни помпи за съединител; Съединители; Диференциали; Задвижващи валове; Маховици; Карданни валове; Охладители на трансмисия; Трансмисионни филтри; Трансмисионна течност; Тампони за трансмисия; Трансмисии
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées automobiles et motos > Pièces de transmission pour véhicules: Essieux; Soufflets de cardan; Joints homocinétiques; Disques d'embrayage; Conduites d'embrayage; Maîtres-cylindres d'embrayage; Plaques de pression d'embrayage; Butées de débrayage; Cylindres récepteurs d'embrayage; Embrayages; Différentiels; Arbres d’entraînement; Volants d'inertie; Arbres de transmission; Refroidisseurs de transmission; Filtres de transmission; Liquide de transmission; Supports de transmission; Transmissions
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Motorlu Taşıt Parçaları > Motorlu Araç Şanzımanı ve Aktarma Organı Parçaları: Akslar; Sabit Hız Toz Kapakları; Sabit Hız Mafsalları; Debriyaj Diskleri; Debriyaj Hatları; Debriyaj Ana Silindirleri; Debriyaj Baskı Balatası; Debriyaj Ayırma Yatağı; Debriyaj Ayırma Silindirleri; Kavramalar; Diferansiyeller; Tahrik Milleri; Volanlar; Kardan Milleri; Şanzıman Soğutucuları; Şanzıman Filtreleri; Şanzıman Yağı; Şanzıman Montaj Parçaları; Şanzımanlar
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Gépjárműalkatrészek > Gépjárműsebességváltó- és hajtáslánc-alkatrészek: Tengelyek; Homokinetikus gumiharagok; Homokinetikus csuklók; Kuplungtárcsák; Tengelykapcsoló-vonalak; Tengelykapcsoló-főhengerek; Tengelykapcsoló-nyomólapok; Tengelykapcsoló-kioldócsapágyak; Tengelykapcsoló-munkahengerek; Tengelykapcsolók; Differenciálok; Hajtótengelyek; Lendkerekek; Kardántengelyek; Sebességváltó-hűtők; Sebességváltó-szűrők; Sebességváltó folyadék; Sebességváltó-tartók; Sebességváltók
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Componenti per veicoli a motore > Parti di trasmissione per veicoli a motore: Assi; Cuffie omocinetiche; Giunti omocinetici; Dischi della frizione; Tubi della frizione; Cilindri principali della frizione; Piastre di pressione della frizione; Cuscinetti di rilascio della frizione; Cilindri secondari della frizione; Frizioni; Differenziali; Trasmissioni; Volani; Alberi di trasmissione; Raffreddatori di trasmissione; Filtri di trasmissione; Fluido di trasmissione; Supporti di trasmissione; Trasmissioni
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly motorových vozidel > Součásti převodovek a hnacího ústrojí vozidel: Nápravy; Ochranné měchy na klouby; CV klouby; Spojkové kotouče; Spojkové vedení; Hlavní válce spojky; Přítlačné kotouče spojky; Vypínací ložiska spojky; Pomocné válce spojky; Spojky; Diferenciály; Hnací hřídele; Setrvačníky; Náhonové hřídele; Chladiče převodovky; Převodové filtry; Převodové kapaliny; Držáky převodovky; Převodovky
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Piezas para vehículos motorizados > Piezas de la transmisión y transmisión secundaria de vehículos motorizados: Ejes; Botas de velocidad constante; Juntas homocinéticas; Discos de embrague; Líneas de embrague; Cilindros maestros de embrague; Platos de presión de embrague; Cojinetes de desembrague; Cilindros esclavos del embrague; Embragues; Diferenciales; Ejes motrices; Volantes; Ejes de transmisión; Enfriadores de transmisión; Filtros de transmisión; Líquido de transmisión; Soportes de transmisión; Transmisiones
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely motorových vozidiel > Časti prevodoviek a pohonu motorových vozidiel: Nápravy; CV topánky; CV kĺby; Spojkové kotúče; Spojkové vedenia; Hlavné valce spojky; Prítlačné taniere spojky; Vypínacie ložiská spojky; Pomocné valce spojky; Spojky; Diferenciály; Hnacie hriadele; Zotrvačníky; Kĺbové hriadele; Prevodové chladiče; Prevodové filtre; Prevodová kvapalina; Držiaky prevodovky; Prevodovky
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 汽機車零配件 > 汽機車傳動零件: 車軸; 傳動軸套; 萬向接頭; 離合器片; 離合器線; 離合器總泵; 離合器壓盤; 離合器分離軸承; 離合器分泵; 離合器; 差速器; 傳動軸; 飛輪; 傳動軸; 變速箱冷卻器; 變速箱油濾芯; 變速箱油; 變速箱支架; 變速箱